Utah statutes.
13-14a-9.   Continuing obligation of manufacturer or wholesaler.

(1)  If a manufacturer or wholesaler is purchased by or merges with another company, the purchasing or surviving entity shall bear all of the responsibilities of the original or purchased manufacturer or wholesaler under this chapter.

(2)  If a manufacturer sells a product line, the purchasing entity bears the responsibility of repurchase.

(3)  In the case of a wholesaler who discontinues representing a line for any reason, the manufacturer of that line bears the responsibility to repurchase.



Amended by Chapter 317, 1995 General Session

